Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7204
Applicability of act.

The Quality Assessment and Improvement Act applies to all health carriers that offer closed plans or combination plans having a closed component on and after July 15, 1998. The act, except sections 44-7207 to 44-7209, applies to all health carriers that offer open plans on and after July 1, 1999.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 54.